Missouri, session 2026, HB2670.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 192.131, 192.665, 192.667, 192.700, 192.703, 192.707, 192.710,
192.712, 192.714, 192.716, 192.718, 192.723, 192.725, 197.165, 197.293, 197.294, 643.263,
and 643.265, RSMo, are repealed and nine new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known
as sections 192.131, 192.665, 192.667, 192.700, 192.703, 192.714, 197.293, 197.294, and
643.263, to read as follows:
192.131. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) ["Advisory panel", the infection control advisory panel created by section
197.165;
(2)] "Antibiogram", a record of the resistance of microbes to various antibiotics;
[(3)] (2) "Antimicrobial", the ability of an agent to destroy or prevent the
development of pathogenic action of a microorganism;
[(4)] (3) "Department", the department of health and senior services.
2. Every laboratory performing culture and sensitivity testing on humans in Missouri
shall submit data on health care associated infections to the department in accordance with
this section. The data to be reported shall be defined by regulation of the department [after
considering the recommendations of the advisory panel]. Such data may include
antibiograms and, not later than July 1, 2005, shall include but not be limited to the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2670 2
number of patients or isolates by hospital, ambulatory surgical center, and other facility or
practice setting with methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus (MRSA) or vancomycin-
resistant enterococcus (VRE).
3. Information on infections collected pursuant to this section shall be subject to the
confidentiality protections of this chapter but shall be available in provider-specific form to
appropriate facility and professional licensure authorities.
4. The [advisory panel] department shall [develop a recommended plan to] use
laboratory and health care provider data provided pursuant to this chapter to create a system
to:
(1) Enhance the ability of health care providers and the department to track the
incidence and distribution of preventable infections, with emphasis on those infections that
are most susceptible to interventions and that pose the greatest risk of harm to Missouri
residents; and
(2) Monitor trends in the development of antibiotic-resistant microbes, including but
not limited to methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus (MRSA) and vancomycin-resistant
enterococcus (VRE) infections.
5. In implementing this section, [the advisory panel and] the department shall
conform to guidelines and standards adopted by the federal Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention. [The advisory panel's plan may provide for demonstration projects to assess the
viability of the recommended initiatives.]
192.665. As used in this section, section 192.667, and sections 197.150 to [197.165]
197.162, the following terms mean:
(1) "Charge data", information submitted by health care providers on current charges
for leading procedures and diagnoses;
(2) "Charges by payer", information submitted by hospitals on amount billed to
Medicare, Medicaid, other government sources and all nongovernment sources combined as
one data element;
(3) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(4) "Financial data", information submitted by hospitals drawn from financial
statements which includes the balance sheet, income statement, charity care and bad debt and
charges by payer, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;
(5) "Health care provider", hospitals as defined in section 197.020 and ambulatory
surgical centers and abortion facilities as defined in section 197.200;
(6) "Nosocomial infection", as defined by the federal Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention and applied to infections within hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, abortion
facilities, and other facilities;

HB 2670 3
(7) "Nosocomial infection incidence rate", a risk-adjusted measurement of new cases
of nosocomial infections by procedure or device within a population over a given period of
time, with such measurements defined by rule of the department pursuant to subsection 3 of
section 192.667 for use by all hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, abortion facilities, and
other facilities in complying with the requirements of the Missouri nosocomial infection
control act of 2004;
(8) "Other facility", a type of facility determined to be a source of infections and
designated by rule of the department pursuant to subsection 11 of section 192.667;
(9) "Patient abstract data", data submitted by hospitals which includes but is not
limited to date of birth, sex, race, zip code, county of residence, admission date, discharge
date, principal and other diagnoses, including external causes, principal and other procedures,
procedure dates, total billed charges, disposition of the patient and expected source of
payment with sources categorized according to Medicare, Medicaid, other government,
workers' compensation, all commercial payors coded with a common code, self-pay, no
charge and other.
192.667. 1. All health care providers shall at least annually provide to the department
charge data as required by the department. All hospitals shall at least annually provide patient
abstract data and financial data as required by the department. Hospitals as defined in section
197.020 shall report patient abstract data for outpatients and inpatients. Ambulatory surgical
centers and abortion facilities as defined in section 197.200 shall provide patient abstract data
to the department. The department shall specify by rule the types of information which shall
be submitted and the method of submission.
2. The department shall collect data on the incidence of health care-associated
infections from hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, abortion facilities, and other facilities
as necessary to generate the reports required by this section. Hospitals, ambulatory surgical
centers, abortion facilities, and other facilities shall provide such data in compliance with this
section. In order to streamline government and to eliminate duplicative reporting
requirements, if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or its successor entity,
requires hospitals to submit health care-associated infection data, then hospitals and the
department shall not be required to comply with the health care-associated infection data
reporting requirements of subsections 2 to [17] 16 of this section applicable to hospitals,
except that the department shall post a link on its website to publicly reported data by
hospitals on the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' Hospital Compare website, or
its successor.
3. The department shall promulgate rules specifying the standards and procedures for
the collection, analysis, risk adjustment, and reporting of the incidence of health care-

HB 2670 4
associated infections and the types of infections and procedures to be monitored pursuant to
subsection [13] 12 of this section. In promulgating such rules, the department shall[:
(1)] use methodologies and systems for data collection established by the federal
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's National Healthcare Safety Network, or its
successor[; and
(2) Consider the findings and recommendations of the infection control advisory
panel established pursuant to section 197.165].
4. [By January 1, 2017, the infection control advisory panel created by section
197.165 shall make recommendations to] The department [regarding] will continue to assess
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' health care-associated infection data
collection, analysis, and public reporting requirements for hospitals, ambulatory surgical
centers, and other facilities in the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's
National Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor, in lieu of all or part of the data
collection, analysis, and public reporting requirements of this section. The [advisory panel
recommendations] department shall address which hospitals shall be required as a condition
of licensure to use the National Healthcare Safety Network for data collection; the use of the
National Healthcare Safety Network for risk adjustment and analysis of hospital submitted
data; and the use of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services' Hospital Compare
website, or its successor, for public reporting of the incidence of health care-associated
infection metrics. [The advisory panel shall consider the following factors in developing its
recommendation:
(1) Whether the public is afforded the same or greater access to facility-specific
infection control indicators and metrics;
(2) Whether the data provided to the public is subject to the same or greater accuracy
of risk adjustment;
(3) Whether the public is provided with the same or greater specificity of reporting of
infections by type of facility infections and procedures;
(4) Whether the data is subject to the same or greater level of confidentiality of the
identity of an individual patient;
(5) Whether the National Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor, has the
capacity to receive, analyze, and report the required data for all facilities;
(6) Whether the cost to implement the National Healthcare Safety Network infection
data collection and reporting system is the same or less.]
5. [After considering the recommendations of the infection control advisory panel,
and provided that the requirements of subsection 13 of this section can be met,] The
department shall implement guidelines from the federal Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention's National Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor. It shall be a condition of

HB 2670 5
licensure for hospitals that meet the minimum public reporting requirements of the National
Healthcare Safety Network and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to participate
in the National Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor. Such hospitals shall permit the
National Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor, to disclose facility-specific infection
data to the department as required under this section, and as necessary to provide the public
reports required by the department. It shall be a condition of licensure for any ambulatory
surgical center or abortion facility which does not voluntarily participate in the National
Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor, to submit facility-specific data to the department
as required under this section, and as necessary to provide the public reports required by the
department.
6. The department shall not require the resubmission of data which has been
submitted to the department of health and senior services or the department of social services
under any other provision of law. The department of health and senior services shall accept
data submitted by associations or related organizations on behalf of health care providers by
entering into binding agreements negotiated with such associations or related organizations to
obtain data required pursuant to section 192.665 and this section. A health care provider shall
submit the required information to the department of health and senior services:
(1) If the provider does not submit the required data through such associations or
related organizations;
(2) If no binding agreement has been reached within ninety days of August 28, 1992,
between the department of health and senior services and such associations or related
organizations; or
(3) If a binding agreement has expired for more than ninety days.
7. Information obtained by the department under the provisions of section 192.665
and this section shall not be public information. Reports and studies prepared by the
department based upon such information shall be public information and may identify
individual health care providers. The department of health and senior services may authorize
the use of the data by other research organizations pursuant to the provisions of section
192.067. The department shall not use or release any information provided under section
192.665 and this section which would enable any person to determine any health care
provider's negotiated discounts with specific preferred provider organizations or other
managed care organizations. The department shall not release data in a form which could be
used to identify a patient. Any violation of this subsection is a class A misdemeanor.
8. The department shall undertake a reasonable number of studies and publish
information, including at least an annual consumer guide, in collaboration with health care
providers, business coalitions and consumers based upon the information obtained pursuant to
the provisions of section 192.665 and this section. The department shall allow all health care

HB 2670 6
providers and associations and related organizations who have submitted data which will be
used in any publication to review and comment on the publication prior to its publication or
release for general use. The publication shall be made available to the public for a reasonable
charge.
100 9. Any health care provider which continually and substantially, as these terms are
101 defined by rule, fails to comply with the provisions of this section shall not be allowed to
102 participate in any program administered by the state or to receive any moneys from the state.
103 10. A hospital, as defined in section 197.020, aggrieved by the department's
104 determination of ineligibility for state moneys pursuant to subsection 9 of this section may
105 appeal as provided in section 197.071. An ambulatory surgical center or abortion facility as
106 defined in section 197.200 aggrieved by the department's determination of ineligibility for
107 state moneys pursuant to subsection 9 of this section may appeal as provided in section
108 197.221.
109 11. The department of health may promulgate rules providing for collection of data
110 and publication of the incidence of health care-associated infections for other types of health
111 facilities determined to be sources of infections; except that, physicians' offices shall be
112 exempt from reporting and disclosure of such infections.
113 12. [By January 1, 2017, the advisory panel shall recommend and] The department
114 shall adopt in regulation [with an effective date of no later than January 1, 2018,] the
115 requirements for the reporting of the following types of infections as specified in this
116 subsection:
117 (1) Infections associated with a minimum of four surgical procedures for hospitals
118 and a minimum of two surgical procedures for ambulatory surgical centers that meet the
119 following criteria:
120 (a) Are usually associated with an elective surgical procedure. An "elective surgical
121 procedure" is a planned, nonemergency surgical procedure that may be either medically
122 required such as a hip replacement or optional such as breast augmentation;
123 (b) Demonstrate a high priority aspect such as affecting a large number of patients,
124 having a substantial impact for a smaller population, or being associated with substantial cost,
125 morbidity, or mortality; or
126 (c) Are infections for which reports are collected by the National Healthcare Safety
127 Network or its successor;
128 (2) Central line-related bloodstream infections;
129 (3) Health care-associated infections specified for reporting by hospitals, ambulatory
130 surgical centers, and other health care facilities by the rules of the Centers for Medicare and
131 Medicaid Services to the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's National
132 Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor; and

HB 2670 7
133 (4) Other categories of infections that may be established by rule by the department.
134
135 The department[, in consultation with the advisory panel,] shall be authorized to collect and
136 report data on subsets of each type of infection described in this subsection.
137 13. [In consultation with the infection control advisory panel established pursuant to
138 section 197.165,] The department shall develop and disseminate to the public reports based
139 on data compiled for a period of twelve months. Such reports shall be updated [quarterly] at
140 least annually and shall show for each hospital, ambulatory surgical center, abortion facility,
141 and other facility metrics on risk-adjusted health care-associated infections under this section.
142 14. The types of infections under subsection 12 of this section to be publicly reported
143 shall be determined by the department by rule and shall be consistent with the infections
144 tracked by the National Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor.
145 15. Reports published pursuant to subsection 13 of this section shall be published and
146 readily accessible on the department's internet website. The reports shall be distributed at
147 least annually to the governor and members of the general assembly. The department shall
148 make such reports available to the public for a period of at least two years.
149 16. [The Hospital Industry Data Institute shall publish a report of Missouri hospitals',
150 ambulatory surgical centers', and abortion facilities' compliance with standardized quality of
151 care measures established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for
152 prevention of infections related to surgical procedures. If the Hospital Industry Data Institute
153 fails to do so by July 31, 2008, and annually thereafter, the department shall be authorized to
154 collect information from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or from hospitals,
155 ambulatory surgical centers, and abortion facilities and publish such information in
156 accordance with this section.
157 17.] The data collected or published pursuant to this section shall be available to the
158 department for purposes of licensing hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, and abortion
159 facilities pursuant to chapter 197.
160 [18.] 17. The department shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of
161 section 192.131 and sections 197.150 to 197.160. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
162 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
163 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536
164 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
165 of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
166 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
167 the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2004,
168 shall be invalid and void.

HB 2670 8
169 [19. No later than August 28, 2017,] 18. Each hospital, excluding mental health
170 facilities as defined in section 632.005, and each ambulatory surgical center and abortion
171 facility as defined in section 197.200, shall in consultation with its medical staff establish an
172 antimicrobial stewardship program for evaluating the judicious use of antimicrobials,
173 especially antibiotics that are the last line of defense against resistant infections. The
174 hospital's stewardship program and the results of the program shall be monitored and
175 evaluated by hospital quality improvement departments and shall be available upon
176 inspection to the department. At a minimum, the antimicrobial stewardship program shall be
177 designed to evaluate that hospitalized patients receive, in accordance with accepted medical
178 standards of practice, the appropriate antimicrobial, at the appropriate dose, at the appropriate
179 time, and for the appropriate duration.
180 [20.] 19. Hospitals described in subsection [19] 18 of this section shall meet the
181 National Healthcare Safety Network requirements for reporting antimicrobial usage or
182 resistance by using the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's Antimicrobial Use and
183 Resistance (AUR) Module when conditions of participation promulgated by the Centers for
184 Medicare and Medicaid Services requiring the electronic reporting of antibiotic use or
185 antibiotic resistance by hospitals become effective. When such antimicrobial usage or
186 resistance reporting takes effect, hospitals shall authorize the National Healthcare Safety
187 Network, or its successor, to disclose to the department facility-specific information reported
188 to the AUR Module. Facility-specific data on antibiotic usage and resistance collected under
189 this subsection shall not be disclosed to the public, but the department may release case-
190 specific information to other facilities, physicians, and the public if the department
191 determines on a case-by-case basis that the release of such information is necessary to protect
192 persons in a public health emergency. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a hospital from
193 voluntarily reporting antibiotic use or antibiotic resistance data through the National
194 Healthcare Safety Network, or its successor, prior to the effective date of the conditions of
195 participation requiring the reporting.
196 [21.] 20. The department shall make a report to the general assembly beginning
197 January 1, 2018, and on every January first thereafter on the incidence, type, and distribution
198 of antimicrobial-resistant infections identified in the state and within regions of the state.
192.700. There is hereby established a state arthritis program. [The board and the
committee established by sections 192.700 to 192.727 are to administer state, federal and
private grants and programs dealing with arthritis and related diseases as a part of this arthritis
program.] Regional arthritis [centers] programs established pursuant to sections 192.700 to
192.727 constitute part of the state arthritis program.
192.703. As used in sections 192.700 to 192.727, the [following terms mean:
(1) "Board", the Missouri arthritis advisory board;

HB 2670 9
(2) "Committee", the arthritis program review committee;
(3)] term "director"[,] means the director of the department of health and senior
services.
192.714. 1. Beginning October 1, [1984] 2026, there shall be established within this
state, and within the department of health and senior services, [a network of] regional arthritis
[centers] programs, subject to appropriations, designed to [demonstrate and stimulate the
prompt and effective application of available knowledge for the treatment of patients with
arthritis and related musculoskeletal diseases, and to develop new knowledge essential for the
control of these disorders] improve knowledge and access to arthritis management among
adults with arthritis.
2. The arthritis [centers] programs established pursuant to sections 192.700 to
192.727 shall [operate programs in the area of education of] educate patients, their families,
and the public.
[3. At least one regional arthritis center shall be established in each of the following
seven regions, the boundaries of which shall be determined by the board:
(1) Greater St. Louis area;
(2) Southeast;
(3) Northeast;
(4) Central;
(5) Southwest;
(6) Northwest; and
(7) Greater Kansas City area.]
197.293. 1. In addition to the powers established in sections 197.070 and 197.220,
the department of health and senior services shall use the following standards for enforcing
hospital, ambulatory surgical center, and abortion facility licensure regulations promulgated
to enforce the provisions of sections 197.010 to 197.120, sections 197.150 to [197.165]
197.162, and sections 197.200 to 197.240:
(1) Upon notification of a deficiency in meeting regulatory standards, the hospital,
ambulatory surgical center, or abortion facility shall develop and implement a plan of
correction approved by the department which includes, but is not limited to, the specific type
of corrective action to be taken and an estimated time to complete such action;
(2) If the plan as implemented does not correct the deficiency, the department may
either:
(a) Direct the hospital, ambulatory surgical center, or abortion facility to develop and
implement a plan of correction pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection; or
(b) Require the hospital, ambulatory surgical center, or abortion facility to implement
a plan of correction developed by the department;

HB 2670 10
(3) If there is a continuing deficiency after implementation of the plan of correction
pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection and the hospital, ambulatory surgical center, or
abortion facility has had an opportunity to correct such deficiency, the department may
restrict new inpatient admissions or outpatient entrants to the service or services affected by
such deficiency;
(4) If there is a continuing deficiency after the department restricts new inpatient
admissions or outpatient entrants to the service or services pursuant to subdivision (3) of this
subsection and the hospital, ambulatory surgical center, or abortion facility has had an
opportunity to correct such deficiency, the department may suspend operations in all or part of
the service or services affected by such deficiency;
(5) If there is a continuing deficiency after suspension of operations pursuant to
subdivision (4) of this subsection, the department may deny, suspend or revoke the hospital's,
ambulatory surgical center's, or abortion facility's license pursuant to section 197.070 or
section 197.220.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section to the contrary, if a
deficiency in meeting licensure standards presents an immediate and serious threat to the
patients' health and safety, the department may, based on the scope and severity of the
deficiency, restrict access to the service or services affected by the deficiency until the
hospital, ambulatory surgical center, or abortion facility has developed and implemented an
approved plan of correction. Decisions as to whether a deficiency constitutes an immediate
and serious threat to the patients' health and safety shall be made in accordance with
guidelines established pursuant to regulation of the department of health and senior services
and such decisions shall be approved by the bureau of health facility licensing in the
department of health and senior services, or its successor agency, or by a person authorized by
the regulations to approve such decisions in the absence of the director.
197.294. No information disclosed by the department to the public pursuant to
sections 192.019, 192.020, 192.067, 192.131, 192.138, 192.665, and 192.667, and sections
197.150, 197.152, 197.154, 197.156, 197.158, 197.160, 197.162, [197.165,] and 197.293
shall be used to establish a standard of care in a private civil action.
643.263. 1. Each public school district and private or parochial school in Missouri
shall [report to the department of health and senior services] maintain any reports relating
to the results of the examination of its structures for friable asbestos as required by the
Environmental Protection Agency under the Toxic Substances Control Act, PL 94-469. [All
such reports shall be filed with the department of health and senior services before March 1,
1987.] Other political subdivisions shall [assess] maintain assessments relating to asbestos
in buildings owned, leased or operated by the political subdivisions and [report] reports
relating to the results of the examination of its structures for friable asbestos [to the

HB 2670 11
department of health and senior services by December 31, 1991]. The results of the
assessment shall be public information and shall be readily available to the public and
employees of each political subdivision and each school district and private and parochial
school.
2. If the assessment indicates the presence of asbestos-containing materials, the report
shall identify the location of all materials containing asbestos, the location and square footage
of friable asbestos, the average number of persons exposed, the percent of asbestos found in
the material, the test used to assess the material and plans for management of any friable
asbestos. The report shall also describe any plans for interim measures, such as treating or
covering friable asbestos, to be taken pending management of the material. Any political
subdivision, any school district and any private or parochial school which adopts interim
measures or which has not completed its management plan shall reevaluate the material
biennially and report its findings to [the department of health and senior services and make its
findings available to] its employees and the public. Any political subdivision, any school
district and any private or parochial school which identifies nonfriable asbestos shall, no less
often than every three years, reevaluate the material and report its findings to [the department
of health and senior services and make its findings available to] its employees and the public.
[The department of health and senior services shall provide technical assistance including
training, consultation and inspection upon request to political subdivisions in identifying
buildings owned, leased or operated by political subdivisions which have asbestos-containing
materials.
3. The department of health and senior services shall annually provide the department
of elementary and secondary education with a list of all public school districts whose
buildings contain friable asbestos.
4. The department of health and senior services shall, in cooperation with the office of
administration, assess asbestos in buildings owned, operated or leased by the state of Missouri
and report its findings to the office of administration.]
[192.707. 1. The "Missouri Arthritis Advisory Board" is established
within the department of health and senior services, as a continuation of the
arthritis advisory board in existence on August 13, 1984. The board shall
consist of twenty-five members. The members of the board that are serving on
August 13, 1984, shall continue until the expiration of this term. The board
shall submit a list of names to the director as recommendations to fill expired
terms on the board. The director shall fill each expired membership on the
board, each of the appointees to serve for a term of four years and until his
successor is appointed and confirmed. Vacancies on the board arising from
reasons other than expiration of the member's term shall be filled by the
director for the time remaining in the unexpired term.

HB 2670 12
2. The board shall meet semiannually and at other such times as called
by the chairman of the board. The chairman shall be elected from the board
membership at the first board meeting, and shall serve as chairman until a new
chairman is elected, or until his term on the board expires, whichever occurs
first.
3. The board shall serve in an advisory capacity to the committee, and
report annually to the department and to the state board of health and senior
services regarding the implementing of the statewide arthritis plan, making
recommendations for necessary changes in content and direction.
4. The board shall be responsible for development and
recommendations of guidelines for programs supported under the state
arthritis program, and make recommendations on program relevance of grant
applications funded under the state arthritis program. The board will make
final recommendations to the director regarding programs and grants of the
state arthritis program.
5. Any reimbursement of members of the board for their actual and
necessary expenses shall be subject to appropriations.]
[192.710. 1. The "Arthritis Program Review Committee" is hereby
created within the department of health and senior services. This committee
shall consist of fifteen members, two from each of the seven regions set forth
in section 192.714 and one at-large member. The fourteen regional members
shall be nominated to the committee by the board. The one at-large member
shall be nominated by the state board of health and senior services. The
members of the committee shall include at least one from each of the
following categories: rheumatology educators, practicing rheumatologists,
primary care practitioners, nurses, allied health professionals, arthritis patients,
and members of the general public. Members of the committee shall be
appointed by the director in consultation with the board of health and senior
services. Of the fifteen initial members, five shall have a two-year term, five
shall have a three-year term, and five shall have a four-year term. Thereafter,
each member shall serve a four-year term and until his successor is appointed
and confirmed. Vacancies on the committee arising from reasons other than
expiration of the member's term shall be filled by the director for the time
remaining in the unexpired term.
2. The committee shall meet annually and at other such times as called
by the chairman of the committee. The chairman shall be elected annually
from the committee membership at the first committee meeting and shall serve
as chairman until a new chairman is elected, or until his term on the committee
expires, whichever occurs first.
3. The committee shall review, make site visits and determine and
make recommendations to the board on the merit of regional arthritis center
applications. No program or other activity will be recommended for funding
by the board without the favorable review of the committee.
4. The arthritis program coordinator shall serve the committee as its
executive administrator.]

HB 2670 13
[192.712. Committee and board members shall serve without
compensation, but their expenses incurred in carrying out their official
duties shall, subject to appropriations, be reimbursed by the state.]
[192.716. Beginning upon receipt of appropriations for that purpose
and subject to the availability of appropriations, but not before October 1,
1984, the arthritis centers established pursuant to section 192.714 shall operate
programs in the following areas:
(1) Education at all levels for various health professionals; and
(2) Improved patient care and other arthritis control activities aimed at
benefitting communities served by the center.]
[192.718. 1. Beginning upon receipt of appropriations for that purpose
and subject to the availability of appropriations, but not before October 1,
1984, each year the board may grant three one-year, state-supported clinical
rheumatology fellowships which might include four to six months of a
community-based experience in one or more of the regional arthritis centers
and six to eight months at an academic institution in this state which is willing
and qualified to train rheumatology fellows.
2. A candidate for a fellowship granted pursuant to this section shall be
approved by the director, the board, the academic institution, and the regional
arthritis center director.
3. Each fellowship granted pursuant to this section shall consist of an
appropriate stipend and either adequate housing or a housing allowance in an
amount to be determined by the board.]
[192.723. Beginning upon receipt of appropriations for that purpose
and subject to the availability of appropriations, but not before July 1, 1985,
innovative research feasibility studies which cannot be funded by traditional
mechanisms and which have significance for having impact on the state
arthritis problem may be carried out by arthritis centers established pursuant to
section 192.714.]
[192.725. Beginning upon receipt of appropriations for that purpose
and subject to the availability of appropriations, but not before July 1, 1985, a
statewide "Arthritis Information Network" shall be established, consisting of a
statewide WATS telephone system, staffed by volunteers insofar as possible.]
[197.165. 1. The department shall appoint an "Infection Control
Advisory Panel" for the purposes of implementing sections 192.131 and
192.667.
2. Members of the infection control advisory panel shall include:
(1) Two public members;
(2) Three board-certified or board-eligible physicians licensed
pursuant to chapter 334 who are affiliated with a Missouri hospital or
medical school, active members of the Society for Health Care Epidemiology
of America, and have demonstrated interest and expertise in health facility
infection control;

HB 2670 14
(3) One physician licensed pursuant to chapter 334 who is active in the
practice of medicine in Missouri and who holds medical staff privileges at a
Missouri hospital;
(4) Four infection control practitioners certified by the certification
board of infection control and epidemiology, at least two of whom shall be
practicing in a rural hospital or setting and at least two of whom shall be
registered professional nurses licensed under chapter 335;
(5) A medical statistician with an advanced degree in such specialty;
(6) A clinical microbiologist with an advanced degree in such
specialty;
(7) Three employees of the department, representing the functions of
hospital, ambulatory surgical center, and abortion facility licensure,
epidemiology and health data analysis, who shall serve as ex officio
nonvoting members of the panel.
3. Reasonable expenses of the panel shall be paid from private
donations made specifically for that purpose to the "Infection Control
Advisory Panel Fund", which is hereby created in the state treasury. If such
donations are not received from private sources, then the provisions of this act
shall be implemented without the advisory panel.]
[643.265. The department of health and senior services and the
department of natural resources shall develop an interagency agreement
establishing agency responsibilities and procedures concerning asbestos
reporting, removal and treatment. The department of health and senior
services is hereby designated the state agency for the administration of loans
and grants under the Asbestos School Hazard Abatement Act of 1984, Public
Law 98-377, and other federally funded loan or grant programs for the
abatement of asbestos.]
✔